North Carolina, session 2025, SB837.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 66 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 52.
"Financial Responsibility for Certain Motocross Facilities.
"§ 66-511. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) ATV. – An all-terrain vehicle, as defined in G.S. 20-4.01.
(2) Commissioner. – The Commissioner of Insurance.
(3) Motocross facility. – A facility with one or more courses and related support
facilities featuring natural or man-made obstacles used to conduct races or
skills competitions for riders of ATVs or off-road motorcycles.
(4) Motorcycle. – Defined in G.S. 20-4.01.
(5) Off-road motorcycle. – A motorcycle designed exclusively for off-road use
by an individual rider with not more than two wheels in contact with the
ground.
(6) Person. – An individual, association, partnership, limited liability company,
firm, corporation, or private organization.
"§ 66-512. Liability insurance.
(a) Insurance Required. – A person cannot own or operate a motocross facility unless the
person carries insurance coverage provided by an accepted insurer of at least one million dollars
($1,000,000) per occurrence and two million dollars ($2,000,000) in the aggregate against
liability for injury to persons or property arising out of the operation of such facility or use of
such device. The insurance contract cannot include per person sublimits to liability. A person
required to be insured under this section must immediately notify the Commissioner upon receipt
of notice of cancellation, suspension, or nonrenewal of the policy.
(b) Proof of Insurance. – A person operating a motocross facility shall provide proof of
insurance coverage upon request by the Commissioner. Upon failure of the person to provide
proof of insurance, the Commissioner shall prevent operation of the facility until the person
provides proof of the required insurance coverage.
(c) Acceptable Insurer. – The insurance contract must be provided by an insurer or surety
that is acceptable to the Commissioner and authorized to transact business in this State. The
Commissioner cannot accept any commercial general liability insurance policy unless it obligates
*S837-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the insurer to give written notice to the person at least 30 days before any proposed cancellation,
suspension, or nonrenewal of the policy.
"§ 66-513. Exceptions.
This Article does not apply to any one or more of the following:
(1) A motocross facility installed on private property that is not open to the public
and for which no fee is charged.
(2) A motocross facility owned or operated by the State, a unit of local
government, or any political subdivision thereof.
"§ 66-514. Rulemaking authority.
The Commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this Article."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Insurance the nonrecurring sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for an awareness campaign
highlighting risks to young riders.
SECTION 3. The rulemaking authority set out in G.S. 66-514, as enacted by Section
1 of this act, is effective when this act becomes law. The remainder of this act becomes effective
July 1, 2027.
Page 2 Senate Bill 837-First Edition